Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; INTERFAITH ACTION WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Interfaith Action to support workforce training, job placement assistance, and employer connections for individuals experiencing housing instability. Grant proceeds may be used to support licensure and certification in high-demand health care fields, expand child care workforce training, and develop employer partnerships for direct hiring pathways. new text end